Utah statutes.
62A-15-501.   DUI -- Legislative policy -- Rehabilitation treatment and evaluation -- Use of victim impact panels.

The Legislature finds that drivers impaired by alcohol or drugs constitute a major problem in this state and that the problem demands a comprehensive detection, intervention, education, and treatment program including emergency services, outpatient treatment, detoxification, residential care, inpatient care, medical and psychological care, social service care, vocational rehabilitation, and career counseling through public and private agencies.  It is the policy of this state to provide those programs at the expense of persons convicted of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs.  It is also the policy of this state to utilize victim impact panels to assist persons convicted of driving under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs to gain a full understanding of the severity of their offense.



Amended by Chapter 81, 2009 General Session

